Texas statutes.
AGRICULTURE CODE

TITLE 6. PRODUCTION, PROCESSING, AND SALE OF ANIMAL PRODUCTS

SUBTITLE C. CONTROL OF ANIMAL DISEASES AND PESTS

CHAPTER 164. SCABIES CONTROL

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 164.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commission" means the Texas Animal Health Commission.

(2) "Inspector" means an inspector employed by the commission, including the chief inspector, a district supervising inspector, or a local inspector.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1420, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Sec. 164.002. SCABIES INFECTION OR EXPOSURE. (a) For purposes of this chapter, cattle or sheep are scabies-infected if:

(1) actually infected with scabies; or

(2) in a herd in which scabies infection is present.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c) of this section, cattle or sheep are exposed to scabies for purposes of this chapter if:

(1) the cattle or sheep enter or have access to any place, including a corral, shed, car, road, or pasture, that scabies-infected cattle or sheep have entered or had access to during the preceding 90 days; or

(2) the sheep are shorn by a shearing plant that has shorn scabies-infected sheep within the preceding 90 days.

(c) Cattle or sheep are not exposed to scabies under Subsection (b) of this section if the place or plant has been disinfected since the infected cattle or sheep were removed. This subsection does not exempt the cattle or sheep from treatment required by this chapter.

(d) If an inspector determines that a scabies infection exists among cattle, sheep, or goats or that cattle, sheep, or goats have been exposed to scabies, the infection or exposure is considered to continue until the commission determines that the infection or exposure has been eradicated through methods prescribed by rule of the commission.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1420, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 164.003. INSPECTORS. (a) For the purpose of eradicating scabies, the commission may employ a chief inspector, district supervising inspectors, and local inspectors.

(b) The chief inspector shall supervise the inspectors engaged in scabies eradication.

(c) The state shall pay the salaries of the chief inspector and the district supervising inspectors. The counties shall pay the salaries and necessary traveling expenses of local inspectors.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1420, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Sec. 164.004. DUTIES OF INSPECTORS. (a) All treatments, inspections, and certifications for scabies eradication and the disinfection of all equipment or facilities required by this chapter shall be performed by or under the supervision of an inspector.

(b) Local inspectors shall perform all duties necessary for the treatment, inspection, and certification of livestock under this chapter.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1420, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 164.005. ENTRY POWER. (a) An inspector is entitled to enter any public or private place where cattle or sheep are kept or ranged for the purpose of:

(1) ascertaining the presence of scabies infection;

(2) ascertaining any exposure to scabies; or

(3) inspecting, classifying, or treating cattle or sheep for scabies infection or exposure.

(b) If the inspector under Subsection (a) of this section desires to be accompanied by a peace officer, the inspector may apply for and obtain a search warrant as provided by Section 161.047 of this code.

(c) The person who owns or controls the place to be entered under this section or who owns or controls the animals shall, on request of the inspector or a member of the commission, gather the animals on the range for inspection. Failure or refusal to gather the animals is prima facie evidence that the premises and the animals are infected with scabies and authorizes the commission to quarantine the premises or animals in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1421, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 164.006. ACTIONS OF COMMISSION. The presiding officer of the commission may perform any act or duty of the commission under this chapter.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1421, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 29, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER B. TREATMENT

Sec. 164.021. TREATMENT REQUIRED ON ORDER OF COMMISSION. (a) The commission by written order may direct a person who owns, controls, or cares for cattle or sheep that are scabies-infected or are exposed to scabies, to treat any or all of those animals for the purpose of destroying, eradicating, curing, or removing a scabies infection or a source of exposure to scabies.

(b) An order of the commission under this section must be signed by the commission or the presiding officer of the commission and must contain the following:

(1) the date of issuance;

(2) the name of the person to whom the order is made;

(3) the approximate location of the premises on which the animals are located;

(4) the county in which the premises are located;

(5) a statement in clear and intelligible language that the sheep or cattle that the person owns, controls, or cares for are infected with or exposed to scabies;

(6) an order directing the person to treat the animals, under the supervision of an inspector and in the manner prescribed by the commission; and

(7) a designation of the date, time, and place that the treatment is to occur.

(c) An order under this section must be delivered to the person owning or controlling the cattle or sheep not later than the 14th day before the date and time for the treatment designated in the order.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1421, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 30, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 164.022. HEARING. (a) Not later than the fifth day following the day on which a person receives an order to treat cattle or sheep, the person may file with the commission or the presiding officer of the commission a written affidavit that:

(1) denies that the animals are subject to being treated under this chapter, or states that, for good and sufficient reason set out in the affidavit, the person is entitled to have the order rescinded or the treatment postponed; and

(2) requests that the commission withhold enforcement of the order and grant a hearing on the matter or investigate the matter as necessary to determine the correctness of the statement contained in the affidavit.

(b) Not later than the fifth day following the day on which the commission receives an affidavit under Subsection (a) of this section, the commission shall, if desired by the affiant, grant the affiant a hearing in the office of the presiding officer. The commission shall give the affiant notice of the hearing by telegram or registered mail and shall hold the hearing not earlier than the fourth day following the day of giving that notice.

(c) The commission shall consider the affidavit at the hearing and shall, in person or by agent, investigate the matter as the commission considers necessary.

(d) If the commission finds that the statement in the affidavit is correct, the commission shall rescind the order or postpone the treatment until a time that the commission considers proper. If the commission finds that the statement in the affidavit is not correct, the commission shall enforce the order on the date and at the time designated in the order.

(e) Following a hearing, the commission shall deliver its written findings to the affiant not later than the fourth day before the date and time that the order requires the animals to be treated.

(f) A person who is dissatisfied with the findings of the commission under this section may apply to a court of proper venue and jurisdiction for an injunction or other relief.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1422, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 31, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 23, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 164.023. METHOD OF TREATMENT. The commission by rule shall prescribe the methods of treatment available for the treatment of scabies under this chapter.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1422, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 24, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 164.028. TREATMENT AT EXPENSE OF COUNTY. If a person ordered to treat cattle or sheep under this chapter fails or refuses to treat the animals, the county commissioners court shall:

(1) provide the necessary equipment and facilities for the treatment of the animals;

(2) have the animals treated in accordance with this chapter; and

(3) pay the expenses of the treatment by warrant drawn on the general funds of the county.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1423, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 25, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER C. QUARANTINES

Sec. 164.041. ESTABLISHMENT. (a) The commission may establish a quarantine against all or the portion of a state, territory, or country in which the commission determines scabies exists. A quarantine established under this section is governed by Chapter 161, except that only a scabies inspector recognized by the commission for that purpose in the quarantine notice may issue certificates or permits for the movement of cattle subject to the quarantine. A person who violates the quarantine is subject to the penalties provided by Chapter 161.

(b) If an inspector determines that a scabies infection or exposure exists in a county or area of this state, on any premises, including a road, pasture, lot, yard, stockyard, or enclosure, or among any cattle or sheep, the commission may quarantine the area, premises, or animals.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1423, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 164.042. NOTICE. The commission shall give notice of a quarantine established under Section 164.041(b) of this code in one of the following manners:

(1) by posting written notice of the quarantine at the courthouse door of the county in which the quarantine is established and at two other conspicuous places in the area or on the premises quarantined;

(2) by publishing notice in a newspaper in the county or, if there is no newspaper in the county, by publishing notice in a newspaper in an adjoining county; or

(3) by delivering written or printed notice to the owner or caretaker of the animals or premises to be quarantined, with the delivery made in person by a commission inspector, employee, or member or with the delivery made by United States mail.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1424, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Sec. 164.043. EFFECT OF QUARANTINE. If a county or area is quarantined under Section 164.041(b) of this code, all premises within the county or area and all cattle and sheep within the county or area are quarantined even though not separately designated.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1424, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Sec. 164.044. MOVEMENT FROM QUARANTINED PREMISES; MOVEMENT OF QUARANTINED ANIMALS. (a) A person may not move or permit to be moved cattle or sheep that are under quarantine for scabies infection or exposure or that are on premises quarantined for scabies infection or exposure unless the cattle or sheep are certified by a commission inspector.

(b) If the commission finds animals that have been moved in violation of a quarantine established under this chapter, the commission shall quarantine the animals until they have been properly tested or treated in accordance with the rules of the commission.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1424, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 27, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 164.045. DISINFECTION OF SHEARING PLANT IN QUARANTINED AREA. (a) If scabies-infected sheep located on premise quarantined for sheep scabies infection are shorn by an itinerant shearing plant or crew, the person owning, controlling, or having charge of the plant or crew shall, in accordance with this section, disinfect the plant and the wearing apparel of the crew, including laborers who shear the sheep or pack the wool, before the plant or crew moves from the premises where the sheep are shorn.

(b) All utensils, machinery, floors, ground coverings, and other portions of the plant that come in contact with the body of the sheep must be thoroughly cleaned with pure gasoline. The wearing apparel of the shearers or laborers must be submerged in boiling water for at least five minutes.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1424, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Sec. 164.046. DISINFECTION OF QUARANTINED PREMISES. (a) In accordance with this section, the owner, lessee, or person in charge of premises quarantined for sheep scabies shall cleanse and disinfect all places in which infected or exposed sheep have been closely confined, including corrals, water lots, pens, and sheds.

(b) The person shall remove and burn or bury all manure and litter and then spray the surface of the places in which the sheep were confined with a solution of six ounces of 95 percent carbolic acid to each gallon of water or a solution of four ounces of cresol compound USP to each gallon of water.

(c) Disinfection under this section must be performed under the supervision of a commission inspector and before uninfected or unexposed sheep are permitted to enter the places to be disinfected.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1425, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

SUBCHAPTER D. IMPORTATION OF SHEEP

Sec. 164.062. CERTIFICATE REQUIRED. (a) A person may not import sheep into this state unless the shipment is accompanied by a certificate certifying that:

(1) the sheep are free from scabies infection and exposure; or

(2) the sheep have been treated by a method recognized by the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, United States Department of Agriculture, for eradication of sheep scabies and in a manner designed to have eradicated infection or exposure within 10 days prior to the date of importation.

(b) A certificate under this section must be issued by an accredited veterinarian of the state of origin of the shipment or by a veterinarian of the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, United States Department of Agriculture.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1425, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 44, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 28, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 164.063. QUARANTINE OF IMPORTED SHEEP. If the certificate for a shipment of sheep shows that the sheep were treated at the point of origin in accordance with Section 164.062(a)(2), the sheep shall be quarantined at the range on which the sheep are placed in this state for a period of 180 days.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1425, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 29, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 164.064. DESIGNATION OF INFECTED OR FREE AREAS; TREATMENT REQUIREMENTS. The commission may adopt rules designating areas as infected or free from infection and shall establish treatment requirements for the importation of sheep into this state.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1426, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 30, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 164.065. EXHIBITIONS. The commission shall provide an importer of show sheep a reasonable length of time, not to exceed 60 days after the date of importation, in which to display the sheep at county fairs or livestock exhibitions. The importer shall keep the sheep separate from all sheep other than show sheep and shall treat the sheep as required by the commission before they are distributed to the range.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1426, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 31, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER E. REMEDIES AND PENALTIES

Sec. 164.082. CIVIL SUITS TO RECOVER PENALTY FOR CORPORATE OFFENSE. If the person who commits an offense under this subchapter is a corporation, the county attorney of the county in which the offense occurred shall sue that person in a court of competent jurisdiction on behalf of the state for the collection of the fine provided for the offense.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1426, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Sec. 164.083. FAILURE TO TREAT FOR SCABIES. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) owns, controls, or cares for cattle or sheep infected with scabies or cattle or sheep that have been exposed to scabies infection within six months prior to the date of an order to treat under Section 164.021; and

(2) fails or refuses to treat the sheep or cattle at the time and in the manner provided by the order of the commission.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

(c) A person commits a separate offense for each day of failure or refusal.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1426, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 45, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 32, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 33, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 164.084. MOVEMENT OF INFECTED, EXPOSED, OR QUARANTINED ANIMALS. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) moves cattle or sheep in violation of Section 164.044(a) of this code; or

(2) moves or permits to be moved along or across a public highway or railroad, or on or across the land or premises of another person, cattle or sheep that are infected with scabies, exposed to scabies, or quarantined for scabies.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

(c) A person commits a separate offense under Subsection (a)(2) of this section for each highway, railroad, or person's land or premises along, across, or onto which the person moves the cattle or sheep.

(d) Venue for prosecution of an offense under Subsection (a)(2) of this section is in any county into which or through which the cattle or sheep are moved.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1426, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 46, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 164.085. REFUSAL TO PERMIT ENTRY OR GATHER ANIMALS FOR INSPECTION. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) refuses to permit an inspector to enter any premises of which the person is the owner, tenant, or caretaker for the purpose of inspecting, classifying, or treating animals infected or exposed to scabies; or

(2) refuses to gather animals in accordance with Section 164.005(c).

(b) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

(c) A person commits a separate offense for each day of refusal.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1427, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 47, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (S.B. 705), Sec. 34, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 164.086. FAILURE TO DISINFECT SHEARING PLANT. (a) A person commits an offense if the person fails or refuses to disinfect all or part of a shearing plant, or the wearing apparel of each person shearing the sheep or handling or packing the wool, in accordance with Section 164.045 of this code.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1427, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 48, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 164.087. FAILURE TO PROPERLY DISINFECT QUARANTINED PREMISES. (a) A person commits an offense if the person violates a provision of Section 164.046 of this code.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1427, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 164.088. IMPORTATION OF SHEEP WITHOUT CERTIFICATE OR PERMIT. (a) A person commits an offense if the person imports sheep into this state in violation of Subchapter D of this chapter.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor for each head of sheep imported in violation of Subchapter D of this chapter.

(c) A person commits a separate offense for each county into which or through which the sheep are moved.

(d) Venue for prosecution of an offense under this section is in any county into which or through which the sheep are moved.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1427, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 50, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.